District of Columbia statutes.
29-104.06

Termination of listing of commercial registered agent.

(a)

A commercial registered agent may terminate its listing as a commercial registered agent by delivering to the Mayor for filing a commercial registered agent termination statement signed by the agent which states:

(1)

The name of the agent as listed under § 29-104.05; and

(2)

That the agent is no longer in the business of serving as a commercial registered agent in the District.

(b)

A commercial registered agent termination statement shall be effective at 12:01 a.m. on the 31st day after the day on which it is delivered to the Mayor for filing.

(c)

The commercial registered agent promptly shall furnish each entity represented by the agent notice in a record of the filing of the commercial registered agent termination statement.

(d)

When a commercial registered agent termination statement takes effect, the commercial registered agent ceases to be a registered agent for each entity formerly represented by it. Until an entity formerly represented by a terminated commercial registered agent designates a new registered agent, service of process may be made on the entity pursuant to § 29-104.12. Termination of the listing of a commercial registered agent under this section shall not affect any contractual rights a represented entity has against the agent or that the agent has against the entity.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Mar. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 19-210, § 2(a)(20), 59 DCR 13171
This section is referenced in § 29-104.09.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-210 deleted “or on behalf of” following “signed by” in (a); and in (d) substituted “a registered agent for” for “an agent for service of process on”, and “designates” for “appoints”.
Application of Law 19-210: Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-210 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2012.